Wyoming, session 2026, SF0054.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 13-2-216 and 13-12-127 are created to
read:
13-2-216. Conversion of special purpose depository
institution into state bank.
(a) The commissioner, with approval of the board, may
convert the charter of a special purpose depository
institution chartered under W.S. 13‑12‑115 to a state bank
chartered under this article. A conversion shall occur as
follows:
(i) A special purpose depository institution
seeking to convert its charter to a state bank shall file
an application to convert that contains a comprehensive
plan for conversion as required by this section and rules
promulgated by the commissioner. The application shall
include a certificate signed by the institution's president
and a majority of the board of directors setting forth the
action taken to support the proposed conversion in
compliance with this section. The plan of conversion and a
proposed organizational instrument that includes the
information required by W.S. 13‑2-202 shall be approved by
the shareholders of the special purpose depository
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
institution prior to submitting an application for
conversion;
(ii) The application to convert shall include a
comprehensive plan for conversion setting forth any
necessary disposition of assets and liabilities in
reasonable detail to effect the conversion, and any other
plans required by the commissioner. The application shall
be accompanied by a fee consistent with W.S. 13-2-208. The
plan of conversion shall provide for the discharge or
assumption of all known and unknown claims and liabilities
of the special purpose depository institution.
Additionally, the application for conversion shall include
other evidence, certifications, affidavits, documents or
information as the commissioner may require, including
demonstration of how assets and liabilities will be
disposed, the timetable for effecting disposition or
transfer of the assets and liabilities and a proposal for
addressing any claims that are asserted after conversion
has been completed;
(iii) The commissioner shall examine the
application for compliance with this section, the
requirements of W.S. 13‑2-207 through 13-2-212 that are not
inconsistent with this section and applicable rules.
(b) Upon receipt of a complete application, the
commissioner shall notify the board. The board, in its
discretion, may allow the commissioner to proceed with
approval of an application on an expedited basis without
further oversight or approval by the board or, if deemed
necessary by the board, the board may require a process
consistent with W.S. 13‑2-207, 13-2-209 and 13‑2-211. Where
an expedited review is allowed by the board, the
commissioner shall approve or deny a conversion application
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
under this section not more than ninety (90) days after
receipt of a complete application.
(c) The application shall not be approved under this
section until the board or commissioner, as applicable, has
ascertained to the board's or commissioner's satisfaction
that the proposed state bank satisfies all criteria under
W.S. 13-2-212(a)(i) through (iii), (v) and (vi), complies
with all applicable capital requirements and capital levels
are sufficient in light of current and prospective
conditions and meets all applicable requirements and any
applicable rules to operate as a state bank. If the
application is to be approved by the board, the board shall
take action consistent with W.S. 13-2-212(b).
(d) If the application is approved and a charter
granted by the board or commissioner, the converting
special purpose depository institution shall not commence
business as a state bank before receiving a certificate of
authority to operate as a state bank from the state banking
commissioner. Upon approval of an application the special
purpose depository institution shall apply for a
certificate of authority to the state banking commissioner
and shall certify that the capital levels comply with all
applicable capital requirements and any additional capital
requirements imposed by the state banking commissioner have
been paid in, the address at which the converted state bank
will operate and that all of the bylaws adopted have been
attached as an exhibit to the application for certificate
of authority. The application for a certificate of
authority shall state who the officers, directors and
stockholders are at that time and attach evidence that
appropriate federal insurance of deposits has been
obtained, where applicable. The state banking commissioner
shall approve or deny an application for a certificate of
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
authority not more than thirty (30) days after a complete
application has been filed. If the state banking
commissioner approves the application, he shall issue a
certificate of authority to the converted state bank not
later than twenty (20) days after approval of the
application. If the state banking commissioner denies the
application, he shall mail a notice of denial to the
converted state bank not later than twenty (20) days after
denial of the application, stating the reasons for denying
the application, and grant to the converted state bank not
more than ninety (90) days to resubmit the application with
the necessary corrections. If the converted state bank
fails to comply with requirements of the notice of denial
within ninety (90) days from the receipt of the notice, the
approval of the application and articles of incorporation
previously issued to the converted state bank shall be
revoked by the state banking commissioner. The failure of
the state banking commissioner to act upon receipt of a
complete application for a certificate of authority within
thirty (30) days shall be deemed an approval. If a
converted state bank fails to commence business in good
faith within one (1) year after the issuance of a
certificate of authority by the state banking commissioner
or any required federal approval, whichever is later, the
charter and certificate of authority shall expire.
(e) A state bank that results from a conversion under
this section shall be deemed to have been in existence for
the same period of time as the special purpose depository
institution from which it converted and shall surrender its
certificate of authority under W.S. 13-12-116. Upon
completion of the conversion the state bank shall not use
the term "special purpose depository institution" in its
business name or in connection with its ongoing business.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(f) The commissioner shall adopt all rules necessary
to implement this section.
13-12-127. Conversion of state bank into special
purpose depository institution.
(a) The commissioner, with approval of the board, may
convert the charter of a state bank chartered under W.S.
13-2-201 et. seq, to a special purpose depository
institution chartered under this article. A conversion
shall occur as follows:
(i) A state bank seeking to convert its charter
to a special purpose depository institution shall file an
application to convert that contains a comprehensive plan
for conversion as required by this section and rules
promulgated by the commissioner. The application shall
include a certificate signed by the institution's president
and a majority of the board of directors setting forth the
action taken to support the proposed conversion in
compliance with this section. The plan of conversion and a
proposed organizational instrument that includes the
information required by W.S. 13‑12-109 shall be approved by
the shareholders of the state bank prior to submitting an
application for conversion;
(ii) The application to convert shall include a
comprehensive plan for conversion setting forth any
necessary disposition of assets and liabilities in
reasonable detail to effect the conversion, and any other
plans required by the commissioner. The application shall
be accompanied by a fee consistent with W.S. 13-12-111. The
plan of conversion shall provide for the discharge or
assumption of all known and unknown claims and liabilities
of the state bank. Additionally, the application for
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
conversion shall include other evidence, certifications,
affidavits, documents or information as the commissioner
may require, including demonstration of how assets and
liabilities will be disposed, the timetable for effecting
disposition or transfer of the assets and liabilities and a
proposal for addressing any claims that are asserted after
conversion has been completed;
(iii) The commissioner shall examine the
application for compliance with this section, the
requirements of W.S. 13-12-102 through 13-12-116 and
13-12-118 that are not inconsistent with this section and
applicable rules.
(b) Upon receipt of a complete application, the
commissioner shall notify the board. The board, in its
discretion, may allow the commissioner to proceed with
approval of an application on an expedited basis without
further oversight or approval by the board or, if deemed
necessary by the board, the board may require a process
consistent with W.S. 13‑12-112 through 13-12-115. Where an
expedited review is allowed by the board, the commissioner
shall approve or deny a conversion application under this
section not more than ninety (90) days after receipt of a
complete application.
(c) The application shall not be approved under this
section until the board or commissioner, as applicable, has
ascertained to the board's or commissioner's satisfaction
that the proposed special purpose depository institution
satisfies all criteria under W.S. 13-12-115(a) and meets
all applicable requirements and any applicable rules to
operate as a special purpose depository institution. If the
application is to be approved by the board, the board shall
take action consistent with W.S. 13-12-115(b).
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(d) If the application is approved and a charter is
granted by the board or commissioner, the converting state
bank shall not commence business as a special purpose
depository institution before receiving a certificate of
authority to operate as a special purpose depository
institution from the state banking commissioner. Upon
approval of an application, the converting state bank shall
apply for a certificate of authority to the state banking
commissioner and shall certify that the capital and surplus
have been paid in, the address at which the converting
state bank will operate as a special purpose depository
institution and that all of the bylaws adopted have been
attached as an exhibit to the application for a certificate
of authority. The application for a certificate of
authority shall state who the officers, directors and
stockholders are at that time and attach evidence that
appropriate federal insurance of deposits has been
obtained, where applicable. The state banking commissioner
shall approve or deny an application for a certificate of
authority not more than thirty (30) days after a complete
application has been filed. If the state banking
commissioner approves the application, he shall issue a
certificate of authority to the converted special purpose
depository institution not later than twenty (20) days
after approval of the application. If the state banking
commissioner denies the application, he shall mail a notice
of denial to the converted special purpose depository
institution not later than twenty (20) days after denial of
the application, stating the reasons for denying the
application, and grant to the converted special purpose
depository institution not more than ninety (90) days to
resubmit the application with the necessary corrections. If
the converted special purpose depository institution fails
to comply with requirements of the notice of denial within
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
ninety (90) days from the receipt of the notice, the
approval of the application and articles of incorporation
previously issued to the converted special purpose
depository institution shall be revoked by the state
banking commissioner. The failure of the state banking
commissioner to act upon receipt of a complete application
for a certificate of authority within thirty (30) days
shall be deemed an approval. If a converted special purpose
depository institution fails to commence business in good
faith within one (1) year after the issuance of a
certificate of authority by the state banking commissioner
or any required federal approval, whichever is later, the
charter and certificate of authority shall expire.
(e) A special purpose depository institution that
results from a conversion under this section shall be
deemed to have been in existence for the same period of
time as the state bank from which it converted and shall
surrender its certificate of authority under W.S. 13-2-213.
Upon completion of the conversion the special purpose
depository institution shall not use the term "state bank"
in its business name or in connection with its ongoing
business.
(f) The commissioner shall adopt all rules necessary
to implement this section.
Section 2. W.S. 13-12-102(b)(iv) is amended to read:
13-12-102. Applicability of other provisions.
(b) The following provisions of this title shall not
apply to this chapter:
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iv) W.S. 13-2-201 through 13-2-214 except as
otherwise provided in W.S. 13-2-216;
Section 3. The banking commissioner shall adopt all
rules necessary to implement this act on or before July 1,
2026.
9

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0054
ENROLLED ACT NO. 53, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of
this section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
10